Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 354.44, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Determining applicable law. new text begin (a) Unless paragraph (b) applies to a member applying for retirement under this section: new text end deleted text begin Andeleted text end new text begin (1) a member's retirementnew text end annuity under this chapter must be computed under the law in effect as of the date of termination of teaching servicedeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (2) new text end a former teacher who returns to covered service following a termination and who is not receiving a retirement annuity under this section must have earned at least one-half year of credited service following the return to covered service to be eligible for improved benefits resulting from any law change enacted subsequent to that termination. new text begin (b) This paragraph applies to a member who terminated teaching service before June 30, 2025. The member may elect a retirement annuity calculated under subdivision 6, paragraph (e), as in effect on July 1, 2025, and using a normal retirement age of 65. The member is not required: (1) to return to covered service on or after June 30, 2025, to be entitled to elect the retirement annuity calculated under subdivision 6, paragraph (e), using a normal retirement age of 65; or (2) to return to covered service on or after July 1, 2024, to be entitled to have the retirement annuity calculated under subdivision 6, paragraph (e), using a normal retirement age of 65. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end